Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PRIVATE SECTOR EQUIPMENT TRAINING OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin The private sector equipment training opportunity program is created to act as a catalyst to bring students with specific equipment training needs together with private sector businesses that possess the necessary equipment to fulfill those equipment training needs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Area of employment need career course" means a course that will potentially lead to a career in an occupation identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 175.45, subdivision 1, or meet the definition in Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.99, subdivision 1, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (d) "Educational institution" includes: new text end new text begin (1) public high schools; new text end new text begin (2) public technical colleges; new text end new text begin (3) state community colleges; new text end new text begin (4) state universities; and new text end new text begin (5) the University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) "Student" means a student currently enrolled in an educational institution. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin In facilitating the program, the commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) work with educational institutions to identify those area of employment need career courses that lack the training equipment necessary to educate students with equipment currently used in the profession; and new text end new text begin (2) identify and encourage private businesses that possess the equipment to participate in the equipment training opportunity program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Private sector equipment training tax credit. new text end new text begin (a) A private sector business is allowed a credit against the tax due under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 290, equal to the amount it would cost to rent the equipment used to train students on the private market. new text end new text begin (b) The credit allowed to a private sector business under this subdivision for a taxable year is limited to the lesser of the following amounts: new text end new text begin (1) $.......; or new text end new text begin (2) the total amount of the cost of the equipment on the private market less depreciation. new text end new text begin (c) If the amount of credit which a claimant is eligible to receive under this subdivision exceeds the claimant's tax liability under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 290, the commissioner of revenue shall refund the excess to the claimant. new text end new text begin (d) For a nonresident or a part-year resident, the credit under this subdivision must be allocated based on the percentage calculated under Minnesota Statutes, section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (e) Credits granted to a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership, an S corporation, or multiple owners of property are passed through to the partners, members, shareholders, or owners, respectively, pro rata to each partner, member, shareholder, or owner based on their share of the entity's assets or as specially allocated in their organizational documents or any other executed agreement, as of the last day of the taxable year. new text end new text begin (f) An amount sufficient to pay the refunds required by this section is appropriated to the commissioner of revenue from the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit an annual report by December 31 of each year regarding the equipment training opportunity program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over employment and economic development policy and taxes. The first report is due no later than December 31, 2027. The annual report must describe the following: new text end new text begin (1) the number of students that participated in a private sector equipment training opportunity the previous calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) a list of courses and applicable occupations for which equipment training opportunities were provided; new text end new text begin (3) a list of businesses participating in the equipment training opportunity program; new text end new text begin (4) the amount of tax credits allowed to participating businesses; and new text end new text begin (5) a list of recommendations to the legislature regarding potential program improvements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, except that subdivision 4 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2029. new text end